District of Columbia statutes.
37-131.06

Public markets.

The Mayor may require the permitting of public markets on public space and may require the licensing of managers of public markets on public space and private space.

Oct. 22, 2009, D.C. Law 18-71, § 7, 56 DCR 6619
For temporary (90 day) addition, see § 10(a) of Vending Regulation Emergency Act of 2008 (D.C. Act 17-322, March 19, 2008, 55 DCR 3445).
For temporary (90 day) addition, see § 10(a) of Vending Regulation Emergency Act of 2009 (D.C. Act 18-9, January 29, 2009, 56 DCR 1638).
For temporary (90 day) addition, see § 10(a) of Vending Regulation Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2009 (D.C. Act 18-47, April 27, 2009, 56 DCR 3574).